New Jersey, session 222, A5251.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the New Jersey History Day Act. 2.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     Instruction in State and local history strengthens civic identity, community engagement, and historical understanding. b.    New Jersey has a rich history that is well-suited for incorporation into American history courses, as New Jersey history spans across time periods from pre-Columbian to the present.  New Jersey also played a central role in the founding of the United States.  On December 18th, 1787, New Jersey became the third state to ratify the United States Constitution and later became the first state to ratify the Bill of Rights.  Learning about the impact of this State on the history of the United States can strengthen residents civic engagement. c.     The States history reflects a diverse and evolving population, contributing to its civic, cultural, and economic development.  Dedicating a day to State and local history provides opportunities to establish commonalities across demographics. Through understanding the populations that built our communities, residents of this State can develop a greater sense of community identity. d.    While current law requires the teaching of New Jersey history, there is no designated Statewide observance to highlight and celebrate such history.  By designating and observing a day for the history of New Jersey, the State would provide an interactive opportunity for schools, communities, and cultural institutions to collaborate in educating all generations of residents.  Such collaborations with cultural institutions can also raise awareness of, and support for, these institutions. e.  It is fitting and proper for the State of New Jersey to designate December 18 of each year as New Jersey History Day in New Jersey. 3.    a.  December 18 of each year is designated as New Jersey History Day to acknowledge the contributions of the State and its municipalities to American history and to cultivate civic identity, community engagement, and historical understanding among residents. b.    The Governor 1[shall annually] is respectfully requested to1 issue a proclamation recognizing December 18 1of each year1 as New Jersey History Day. 4.    1[a.]1 Each school district may annually observe New Jersey History Day by 1[designating one day or one week to celebrate] commemorating1 the States history through appropriate instructional activities 1aligned with the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Social Studies1.  Such activities shall, to the greatest extent practicable, include: (1)  instruction on significant events, places, and figures in New Jersey history; (2)  exploration of local or municipal history, including the community in which the school is located; (3)  student projects, including, but not limited to, research presentations, exhibits, performances, or digital media; (4)  visits to local historic sites; (5)  guest speakers; (6)  walking tours or community-based projects; and (7)  public exhibitions of student work. 1[b.  The Department of Education shall provide guidelines and information to school districts for use in planning the activities in observance of New Jersey History Day.]1 5.    The New Jersey Historical Commission, in consultation with the Department of Education, shall: a.     develop and distribute resource materials for school districts; b.    promote Statewide participation in the celebration of New Jersey History Day; and c.     provide, within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the commission for its purposes, grants to support appropriate programs and activities to observe New Jersey History Day. 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.